North Dakota, session 69, HB1508.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 8 of section 57-02-27.2 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
8. Each local assessor shall determine the relative value of each assessment parcel
within the assessor's jurisdiction and shall determine the agricultural value of each
assessment parcel by adjusting the agricultural value estimate for the assessment
district by the relative value of the parcel. Each parcel must then be assessed
according to section 57-02-27. If either a local assessor or a township board of
equalization develops an agricultural value for the lands in its assessment district
differing substantially from the estimate provided by the county director of tax
equalization, written evidence to support the change must be provided to the county
director of tax equalization. In determining the relative value of each assessment
parcel, the local assessor shall apply the following considerations, which are listed in
descending order of significance to the assessment determination:
a. Actual use of the property for cropland or noncropland purposes by the owner of
the parcel.
b. Soil type and soil classification data from detailed or general soil surveys.
Page No. 1 25.1271.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
b.c. The schedule of modifiers that must be used to adjust agricultural property
assessments within the county as approved by the state supervisor of
assessments under subsection 9.
c. Actual use of the property for cropland or noncropland purposes by the owner of
the parcel.
SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2025.
Page No. 2 25.1271.02000